test/src/morphology/V-kakma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kakma: # Verb '/(eng) to tear /(fin) repiä' - partial paradigm
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kaku
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [kakut, kakudõq]
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kakk
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: kakumiq
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [kakutiq, kakudõq]
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: kakvaq
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: [kakuq, kaku-uiq, kaku]
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcSg1: kakuda
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcSg2: [kakutat, kakutadõq]
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcSg3: kakutas
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcPl1: kakutamiq
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcPl2: [kakutatiq, kakutadõq]
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+PcPl3: kakutasõq
     kakma+V+Ind+Prs+Pc+ConNeg: [kakudaq, kakuda-aiq, kakuda]
